Illinois, session 104th, HB631.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Civil Rights Remedies Restoration Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (775 ILCS 60/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Civil 8Rights Remedies Restoration Act.9(Source: P.A. 103-150, eff. 1-1-24.)